Washington statutes.
RCW 2.64.113

Confidentiality—Violations.

The commission shall provide by rule for confidentiality of its investigations and initial proceedings in accordance with Article IV, section 31 of the state Constitution.

Any person violating a rule on confidentiality is subject to a proceeding for contempt in superior court.

[ 1989 c 367 s 9.]

NOTES:

Contingent effective date—1989 c 367: See note following RCW 2.64.010.